North Carolina, session 2025, HB555.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits, shall ensure that a health care provider duly licensed by the State that provides health
care services exclusively through telemedicine services shall not be required to maintain a
physical presence in the State to be considered an eligible provider for enrollment as a Medicaid
provider.
SECTION 2. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits, shall ensure that a medical provider group with health care providers duly licensed by
the State which exclusively offers telemedicine services shall not be required to have an in-State
service address to be eligible to enroll as a Medicaid provider group.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law.
*H555-v-1*